North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36B. Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act.
§§ 36B-1 through 36B-10.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-8, s. 1, effective March 19, 2009.

Cross References.

For similar current provisions, see the Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act,

G.S. 36E-1

et seq.

Commentary

This section is identical to Section 1 of the Uniform Management of Institutional Funds Act except that § 36B-1(2)(iii) was added by the General Statutes Commission to limit the application of the Act to governmental funds that are endowment funds and, thus, eliminate from the scope of the Act any regulation of the management or investment of funds that are not derived from a charitable gift that is not completely expendable.